New York, session 2025-2026, A7430.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 168-f of the correction law, as 2 amended by chapter 67 of the laws of 2008, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 4. Any sex offender shall register with the division no later than ten 5 calendar days after any change of address, any change in employment 6 address, internet accounts with internet access providers belonging to 7 such offender, internet identifiers that such offender uses, or [his or 8 her] their status of enrollment, attendance, employment or residence at 9 any institution of higher education. A fee of ten dollars, as authorized 10 by subdivision eight of section one hundred sixty-eight-b of this arti- 11 cle, shall be submitted by the sex offender each time such offender 12 registers any change of address or any change of [his or her] their 13 status of enrollment, attendance, employment or residence at any insti- 14 tution of higher education. Any failure or omission to submit the 15 required fee shall not affect the acceptance by the division of the 16 change of address or change of status. 17 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 6 of section 168-l of the correction 18 law, as amended by chapter 513 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read 19 as follows: 20 (b) If the risk of repeat offense is moderate, a level two designation 21 shall be given to such sex offender. In such case the law enforcement 22 agency or agencies having jurisdiction and the law enforcement agency or 23 agencies having had jurisdiction at the time of [his or her] their 24 conviction shall be notified and may disseminate relevant information 25 which shall include a photograph and description of the offender and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03076-01-5 A. 7430 2 1 which may include the exact name and any aliases used by the sex offen- 2 der, exact address, address of the offender's place of employment, back- 3 ground information including the offender's crime of conviction, mode of 4 operation, type of victim targeted, the name and address of any institu- 5 tion of higher education at which the sex offender is enrolled, attends, 6 is employed or resides and the description of special conditions imposed 7 on the offender to any entity with vulnerable populations related to the 8 nature of the offense committed by such sex offender. Any entity receiv- 9 ing information on a sex offender may disclose or further disseminate 10 such information at its discretion. In addition, in such case, the 11 information described herein shall also be provided in the subdirectory 12 established in this article and notwithstanding any other provision of 13 law, such information shall, upon request, be made available to the 14 public. 15 Such law enforcement agencies shall compile, maintain and update a 16 listing of vulnerable organizational entities within its jurisdiction. 17 Such listing shall be utilized for notification of such organizations in 18 disseminating such information on level two sex offenders pursuant to 19 this paragraph. Such listing shall include and not be limited to: 20 superintendents of schools or chief school administrators, superinten- 21 dents of parks, public and private libraries, public and private school 22 bus transportation companies, day care centers, nursery schools, pre- 23 schools, neighborhood watch groups, community centers, civic associ- 24 ations, nursing homes, victim's advocacy groups and places of worship. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law.